Missouri, session 2026, HB1899.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.397, to read as follows:
9.397. The first full week in May each year is hereby designated as "Missouri
2 Compost Awareness Week". The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
3 appropriate events and activities to recognize the importance of composting food scraps
4 and yard waste and using compost to create healthier soil.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.